Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0161

Commission—Removal of member—Order of removal—Vacancy.

The governor may remove a member of the commission for neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office. Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of the commission has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the order of removal and statement of causes by certified mail to the last known post office address of the member. If a vacancy occurs on the commission, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 105.]